test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex-der-pahheed_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - pahheeđ: # ML checked

    pahheeđ+V+Inf: pahheeđ
    pahheeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Inf: pahhuđ
    pahheeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pohhuum
    pahheeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: pohhuuh
    pahheeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pahhoo
    pahheeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: pahhojeen
    pahheeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: pohhuuvettee
    pahheeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: pohhuv
    pahheeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: pohhup
    pahheeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: pohhuuvetteđ
    pahheeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: pahhojeh
    pahheeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: pahhojim
    pahheeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: pahhojih
    pahheeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: pohhui
    pahheeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: pohhuim
    pahheeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: pohhuid
    pahheeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: pohhuin
    pahheeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: pohhuim
    pahheeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: pohhuid
    pahheeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: pahhojii
    pahheeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: pohhuuččim
    pahheeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: pohhuuččih
    pahheeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: pohhuuččij
    pahheeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: pohhuuččáim
    pahheeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: pohhuuččáid
    pahheeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: pohhuuččáin
    pahheeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: pohhuuččijm
    pahheeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: pohhuuččijd
    pahheeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: pohhuuččii
    pahheeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: pohhuužeem
    pahheeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: pohhuužeeh
    pahheeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: pahuš
    pahheeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: pohhuužeen
    pahheeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: pohhušvettee
    pahheeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: pohhuužává
    pahheeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: pohhuužep
    pahheeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: pohhušvetteđ
    pahheeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: pohhuužeh
    pahheeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: pohhuu
    pahheeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: pohhum
    pahheeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: pohhuuččii
    pahheeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: pohhuužii
    pahheeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+PrsPrc: pahhojeijee
    pahheeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+PrfPrc: pohhum
    pahheeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Nom: pohhum
    pahheeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Ess: pohhuumin
    pahheeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Loc: pohhuumist
    pahheeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Ill: pohhuumân
    pahheeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ger: pohhuudijn
    pahheeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+VAbess: pahhuuhánnáá
    pahheeđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pavedâm
    pahheeđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: pavedah
    pahheeđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: paaved
    pahheeđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: pavedeen
    pahheeđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: paavedvettee
    pahheeđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: pavedává
    pahheeđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: pavedeh
    pahheeđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: paaved
    pahheeđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: pavedim
    pahheeđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: pavedij
    pahheeđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: pavedii
    pahheeđ+V+Der/d+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: pavediččim
    pahheeđ+V+Der/d+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: pavedičij
    pahheeđ+V+Der/d+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: pavedižžeem
    pahheeđ+V+Der/d+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: pavediš
    pahheeđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: paaved
    pahheeđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: pavedâm
    pahheeđ+V+Der/d+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: pavedižžii
    pahheeđ+V+Der/d+V+PrfPrc: pavedâm
    pahheeđ+V+Der/d+V+VAbess: paavedhennáá
    pahheeđ+V+Der/d+V+VAbess: paavedhinnáá
    pahheeđ+V+Der/d+V+VAbess: paavedhánnáá
    pahheeđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Nom: pavedem
    pahheeđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Ill: paavedmân
    pahheeđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Ess: paavedmin
    pahheeđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Loc: paavedmist
    pahheeđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com: paaveddijn
    pahheeđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com+PxSg1: paaveddijnân
    pahheeđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com+PxSg2: paaveddijnâd
    pahheeđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com+PxSg3: paaveddijnis
    pahheeđ+V+Der/d+V+Ger: paaveddijn
    pahheeđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pavestâm
    pahheeđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pavettâm
    pahheeđ+V+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: paveškuáđám
    pahheeđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pohâlâm
    pahheeđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: poohhâl
    pahheeđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: pohâleen
    pahheeđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: pohâleh
    pahheeđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: poohhâl
    pahheeđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: pohâlim
    pahheeđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: pohâlij
    pahheeđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: pohâlii
